Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 3. Department of Rehabilitative Services.

§§ 51.5-8,
51.5-9.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 60.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, see
Chapter 14 (§

51.5-116

et seq.), generally. For current provisions related to designation of the Department as state agency for purpose of cooperation with federal government, see §

51.5-118

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, in enactment clauses 59 through 71, eliminated the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services, transferring powers and duties to the newly created Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. For comparable sections see §

51.5-116

et seq. Where appropriate the historical references and case notes to former provisions have been transferred to the new provisions.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 64 provides: “That the regulations of the Department for the Aging and the Commissioner of Rehabilitative Services shall be administered by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 59th enactment of this act.”

Former §

51.5-8

, which created the Department of Rehabilitative Services, derived from Code 1950, §§ 2.1-578, 22-330.4:1; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1984, c. 720; 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-8; former § 51.5-9, pertaining to department designated as state agency for purpose of cooperation with federal government, derived from Code 1950, §§ 2.1-584, 22-327, 22-330.9; 1964, c. 276; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-9.

§ 51.5-9.01.
Repealed by Acts 2003, cc. 57 and 73.

Cross references.

For current provisions relating to the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitation, see §

51.5-130

et seq.

§§ 51.5-9.1 through 51.5-10.1.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 60.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to designation of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as state agency for purpose of coordinating rehabilitative services, see §

51.5-119

; Community Rehabilitation Case Management System, see §

51.5-123

; eligibity for long-term case management, see §

51.5-124

; gifts and donations, see §

51.5-125

; donation of equipment, see §

51.5-126

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, in enactment clauses 59 through 71, eliminated the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services, transferring powers and duties to the newly created Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. For comparable sections see §

51.5-116

et seq. Where appropriate the historical references and case notes to former provisions have been transferred to the new provisions.

Former §

51.5-9.1

, pertaining to department designated as state agency for purpose of coordinating rehabilitative services, derived from Code 1950, 1989, c. 176, 2000, c. 151; former § 51.5-9.2 pertaining to Community Rehabilitation Case Management System, derived from 1989, c. 176; former § 51.5-9.3 pertaining to eligibility for long-term rehabilitative case management, derived from 1989, c. 176; former § 51.5-10, pertaining to gifts and donations, derived from Code 1950, §§ 2.1-586, 22-239, 22-330.11; 1964, c. 276; 1970, c. 213; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1984, c. 734; 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-10; § 51.5-10.1, pertaining to donation of equipment, derived from 1986, c. 436, § 51.01-10.1.

§ 51.5-11.
Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 563, cl. 2.

§ 51.5-12.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 7 and 166, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

51.5-12

, which authorized the promotion of efforts to prevent or eliminate environmental barriers to persons with disabilities, was derived from Code 1950, §§ 2.1-582, 22-330.6:1; 1977, c. 534; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-12.